Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3801
Sections, how construed.

Sections 44-3801 to 44-3826 shall be interpreted liberally to aid in maintaining a high level of competence and adherence to professional standards in the performance of dental services.

Laws 1982, LB 139, § 1.